Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated  to the State Department of Agriculture, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
services ..................................... $ 2,213,306
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 8,814,500
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 9,084,058
(4) Market access ........................... $ 3,211,833
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and in-
cluding federal funds for contract  services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or  received by the State Department of Agriculture, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
services ..................................... $ 9,744,750
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 26,201,893
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 16,616,763
(4) Market access ........................... $ 16,096,110
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,335,362 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Parks and Natural Resources
Fund to the State Department of Agriculture for the Oregon Plan, to be used  for activities
and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2017  Act col-
lected or received by the State Department of Agriculture, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
Enrolled Senate Bill 5502 (SB 5502-A) Page 1
services ..................................... $ 181,475
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 3,301,603
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 8,023,220
(4) Market access ........................... $ 6,334,886
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5502 (SB 5502-A) Page 2